Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.215

Acceptance of certain federal aid.

Said annual sum appropriated and granted to the state of Washington in pursuance of said act of congress approved March 16, 1906, shall be paid as therein provided to the treasurer or other officer duly appointed by the board of regents of Washington State University at Pullman, Washington; and the board of regents of such university are hereby required to report thereon as the secretary of agriculture may prescribe.

[ 1977 c 75 s 22; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.215. Prior: 1907 c 198 s 2; RRS s 4586. Formerly RCW 28.80.200.]